Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1354.03
Training Revolving Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby created the Training Revolving Fund to be administered by the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services. All funds received by the personnel division for employee training programs shall be remitted by the personnel division to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1006, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 123.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.